District of Columbia statutes.
15-109

Interest on judgment for damages in contract or tort.

In an action to recover damages for breach of contract the judgment shall allow interest on the amount for which it is rendered from the date of the judgment only. This section does not preclude the jury, or the court, if the trial be by the court, from including interest as an element in the damages awarded, if necessary to fully compensate the plaintiff. In an action to recover damages for a wrong the judgment for the plaintiff shall bear interest.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 677, Pub. L. 88-509, § 3(b)(1)
1981 Ed., § 15-109.
1973 Ed., § 15-109.